Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Chapter 8. Department of Housing and Community Development.

§ 36-131.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and terms have the following meanings, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“Board”
means the Board of Housing and Community Development.

“Consolidated Plan”
means a document setting forth various housing and community development goals, objectives, and strategies to be followed by the Commonwealth in addressing housing and community development conditions in the Commonwealth and serving as the strategic plan for the programs established by the Department and, to the extent and in the manner determined in accordance with §

36-55.27:1

, for the programs established by the Virginia Housing Development Authority. The Consolidated Plan will identify housing and community development needs in the Commonwealth; the level of investment and charges to state housing programs and community development necessary to address the need; the availability of state, local, federal, and nongovernmental sources of funds; and the appropriate mix of loans, grants, and other alternative funding methods for implementing the strategy.

“Department”
means the Department of Housing and Community Development.

“Director”
means the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development.

History.

1977, c. 613; 1992, c. 754; 2002, c. 461.

Editor’s note.

Clause 3 of Acts 1977, c. 613, provides that “in the event that ex officio membership on any board, commission, council, committee or other body is affected by the provisions of this act, the Governor shall designate an appropriate successor officer, employee or member of a board or agency established pursuant to the provisions of this act as a replacement.”

Clause 5 of Acts 1977, c. 613, provides that “all rules and regulations adopted by the State Board of Housing, the State Corporation Commission and the Board of Agriculture and Commerce [now the Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services] which are in effect as of the effective date of this act and which pertain to the subject of this act, shall remain in full force and effect until altered, amended or rescinded by the Board of Housing and Community Development.”

Clause 6 of Acts 1977, c. 613, provides that “as of the effective date of this act [July 1, 1978], the Department of Housing and Community Development shall be deemed successor in interest to the State Corporation Commission, Office of Housing and Department of Intergovernmental Affairs to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties. All right, title and interest in and to any real or tangible personal property vested in the State Corporation Commission, Office of Housing and Department of Intergovernmental Affairs to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties as of the effective date of this act shall be transferred to and taken as standing in the name of the Department of Housing and Community Development.”

Clause 7 of Acts 1977, c. 613, provides that “any employee transferred from one agency to another to support the changes in organization or responsibility resulting from or required by the provisions of this act shall not receive any decrease in salary. Any transferred employee whose present compensation is higher than that authorized by the Department of Personnel and Training [now Department of Human Resource Management] for comparable positions shall not receive any salary increase except those increases from which no class of employees is exempted until the employee’s compensation becomes equivalent with the guidelines of the Department of Personnel and Training for persons in similar positions. The office of the Chief Arson Investigator shall be transferred as a division to the Department of State Police including all employees and property applicable to the function.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 411 provides:

“§ 1. That the Department of Housing and Community Development (Department) shall convene a stakeholder advisory group to evaluate the construction of internal, attached, and detached accessory dwelling units as a strategy to address the Commonwealth’s growing demand for affordable and market-rate housing. The stakeholder advisory group shall (i) to the extent possible, collect data from stakeholders regarding the current state of the for-sale and rental accessory dwelling unit market in the Commonwealth and information regarding projected demand for accessory dwelling units; (ii) solicit input from stakeholders regarding the current implementation of local accessory dwelling unit ordinances in the Commonwealth; (iii) solicit input from stakeholders regarding locally and state-enacted impediments to the development or construction of accessory dwelling units, including state statutes, building codes, and local zoning ordinances and development standards; (iv) identify local tools to facilitate the construction of accessory dwelling units, including alternative permitting processes, waiver or modification of local parking requirements or ratios, expediting permitting processes, small lot ordinances, and density adjustments; and (v) develop recommendations for state policy changes to remove obstacles to local implementation of accessory dwelling units. The stakeholder advisory group shall include representatives from the Department, the Virginia Housing Development Authority, local planning departments, and local building departments; individuals with expertise in land development, construction, land-use and zoning laws and processes, affordable housing, the Virginia Uniform Statewide Building Code, sustainable development, public transit, common interest communities, property owners’ associations, or other areas of expertise as determined by the Department; an affordable housing representative; representatives from social equity organizations; a union representative; a youth organizer; and a representative from the American Association of Retired Persons (AARP). To the extent possible, the Department shall endeavor to ensure balanced geographical representation among the members of the stakeholder advisory group, with representation of rural, suburban, and urban localities and regions of the Commonwealth. The stakeholder advisory group shall receive staff support from the Department. Prior to the first meeting of the stakeholder advisory group, to the extent possible, the Department shall solicit input from the stakeholder advisory group members on the issues enumerated by clauses (i), (ii), (iii), and (iv) and compile such information for presentation at the first meeting of the stakeholder advisory group, and the Department shall continually solicit and compile such input throughout the work of the stakeholder advisory group. The stakeholder advisory group shall report its findings, including any legislative recommendations, to the Director of the Department, the Secretary of Commerce and Trade, the commissioners of the Virginia Housing Development Authority, and the Virginia Housing Commission no later than November 1, 2021. The Department may, in its sole discretion, be permitted to continue its work beyond November 1, 2021, but no later than November 1, 2022.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 461, in the third paragraph, twice substituted “Consolidated Plan” for “Comprehensive Housing Affordability Strategy,” and inserted “and community development” following “housing” in four places.

§ 36-132.
Creation of Department; appointment of Director.

There is hereby created in the executive department the Department of Housing and Community Development. The Department shall be headed by a Director who shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, to serve at the pleasure of the Governor for a term coincident with his own.

History.

1977, c. 613; 1984, c. 720.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 577, cl. 2 repeals Acts 1999, c. 557, cl. 1, as amended by Acts 2000, c. 1033, cl. 1 which had established an indoor air quality task force which was to develop recommendations regarding indoor air quality in public schools and report such recommendations to the House Committees on Education and on Appropriations, and the Senate Committees on Education and Health and on Finance by December 1, 2000.

Acts 2019, c. 723 provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Housing and Community Development is directed to convene stakeholders representing entities that enforce the Uniform Statewide Building Code (USBC) (§

36-97

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) and the Statewide Fire Prevention Code (SFPC) (§

27-94

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) and other law-enforcement organizations to develop proposals for changes to the USBC and SFPC for submission to the Board of Housing and Community Development. Such proposals shall have the goal of assisting in the provision of safety and security measures for the Commonwealth’s public or private elementary and secondary schools and public or private institutions of higher education for active shooter or hostile threats. The review of the stakeholders shall include the examination of (i) locking devices, (ii) barricade devices, and (iii) other safety measures that may be utilized in an active shooter or hostile threat situation that occurs in any classroom or other area where students are located for a finite period of time.”

Acts 2020, c. 482, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Housing and Community Development and the Virginia Housing and Development Authority be requested to study ways to incentivize the development of affordable housing in the Commonwealth of Virginia.

“In conducting its study, the Department of Housing and Community Development and the Virginia Housing and Development Authority shall convene a stakeholder advisory group consisting of individuals with expertise in land development, construction, affordable housing, real estate finance, tax credit syndication, and other areas of expertise as determined by the Department of Housing and Community Development and the Virginia Housing and Development Authority, and at least one resident of an affordable housing property. Such advisory group shall (i) determine the quantity and quality of affordable housing and workforce housing across the Commonwealth, (ii) conduct a review of current programs and policies to determine the effectiveness of current housing policy efforts, (iii) develop an informed projection of future housing needs in the Commonwealth and determine the order of priority of those needs, and (iv) make recommendations for the improvement of housing policy in the Commonwealth.

“The advisory group shall consider the following proposals as well as other proposals it considers advisable during the course of its analysis and deliberations: (a) a Virginia rent subsidy program to work in conjunction with the federal Housing Choice Voucher Program, (b) utility rate reduction for qualified affordable housing, (c) real property tax reduction for qualified affordable housing for localities that desire to provide such an incentive, (d) bond financing options for qualified affordable housing, and (e) existing programs to increase the supply of qualified affordable housing.

“All agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide assistance to the Department of Housing and Community Development and the Virginia Housing and Development Authority for this study, upon request.

“The Department of Housing and Community Development and the Virginia Housing and Development Authority shall complete its meetings by November 30, 2020, and shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly an executive summary and a report of the findings and recommendations of the stakeholder advisory group for publication as a House or Senate document. The executive summary and report shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports no later than the first day of the 2021 Regular Session of the General Assembly and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.”

Acts 2020, c. 517, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The Department of Housing and Community Development (the Department) and the Virginia Housing Development Authority (the Authority) shall convene a stakeholder advisory group to develop draft legislation establishing a Virginia housing opportunity tax credit program for the purpose of providing incentives for the utilization of private equity in the development and construction of affordable housing in the Commonwealth and regulations for implementing such program. The stakeholder advisory group shall also conduct financial modeling to determine the fiscal impact to the Commonwealth of various levels of funding for a Virginia housing opportunity tax credit. The stakeholder advisory group shall determine the most effective and efficient way to administer the program in conjunction with the federal Low-Income Housing Tax Credit Program.

“§ 2. The stakeholder advisory group shall consist of individuals with expertise in land development, construction, affordable housing, real-estate finance, tax credit syndication, the federal Low-Income Housing Tax Credit Program, or other areas of expertise as determined by the Department and the Authority. The stakeholder advisory group shall also include representatives from the Department and the Authority.

§ 3. The stakeholder advisory group shall receive support from the staff of the Department and the Authority.

“§ 4. The stakeholder advisory group shall report its recommendations to the Governor, the Secretary of Commerce and Trade, the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development, and the commissioners of the Virginia Housing Development Authority by September 1, 2020.”

§ 36-132.1.
Commission on Local Government.

The Department shall include the Commission on Local Government, which shall exercise the powers and duties described in §§

15.2-1301

and

15.2-2303.2

and Chapters 29 (§

15.2-2900

et seq.), 32 (§

15.2-3200

et seq.), 33 (§

15.2-3300

et seq.), 34 (§

15.2-3400

et seq.), 35 (§

15.2-3500

et seq.), 36 (§

15.2-3600

et seq.), 38 (§

15.2-3800

et seq.), 39 (§

15.2-3900

et seq.), 40 (§

15.2-4000

et seq.), and 41 (§

15.2-4100

et seq.) of Title 15.2 and § 30-19.03.

History.

2003, c. 197; 2010, c. 410.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 410 inserted “and” following “§§

15.2-1301

,” deleted “through 30-19.03:1.1,” and made related changes.

§ 36-133.
Director to supervise Department.

The Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development shall, under the direction and control of the Governor be responsible for the supervision of the Department and shall exercise such other powers and perform such other duties as may be required of him by the Governor.

History.

1977, c. 613; 1984, c. 720.

§ 36-134.
General powers of Director.

The Director shall have the following general powers:

To employ such personnel as may be required to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of the Department’s duties and the execution of its powers under this chapter, including, but not limited to, contracts with the United States, other states, agencies and governmental subdivisions of this Commonwealth.

To accept grants from the United States government and agencies and instrumentalities thereof and any other source. To these ends, the Department shall have the power to comply with such conditions and execute such agreements as may be necessary, convenient or desirable.

To do all acts necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

1977, c. 613.

§ 36-135.
Board of Housing and Community Development; members; terms; chairman; appointment of ad hoc committee.

The Board of Housing and Community Development within the Department of Housing and Community Development shall consist of 14 members as follows: 11 members, one representing each congressional district in the Commonwealth, who are appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, the Executive Director of the Virginia Housing Development Authority as an ex officio voting member; a member of the Virginia Fire Services Board, to be appointed by the chairman of that Board; and the Director of Regulatory Compliance of the Virginia Building and Code Officials Association, who shall be a member of the Board’s Codes and Standards Committee, but shall not serve as either the chairman of such committee or of the Board. Members shall serve for four-year terms and no member shall serve for more than two full successive terms. A chairman of the Board shall be elected annually by the Board.

Whenever the Board of Housing and Community Development proposes a change to statewide building and fire regulations, the Board may convene an ad hoc committee, including but not limited to representatives of those industry groups directly affected by such change, to advise the Board on such matters.

History.

1977, c. 613; 1989, c. 258; 1992, c. 754; 1993, c. 139; 1997, c. 860; 2003, c. 434; 2004, c. 944; 2012, c. 747.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 139, which amended this section, in cl. 2 provides: “That this act shall not be construed to affect existing appointments for which the terms have not expired. However, any new appointments made after the effective date of this act [July 1, 1993] shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

Acts 1995, c. 53, as amended by Acts 1996, c. 620, was repealed by Acts 1997, c. 860, cl. 2. Therefore, the amendment to this section by Acts 1995, c. 53, which was to become effective July 1, 1997, did not go into effect.

The 1997 amendment

inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and added subsection B.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 434 in subsection A, substituted “13” for “thirteen,” “11” for “eleven,” and “voting” for “nonvoting.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 944 in subsection A, substituted “14 members” for “13 members,” deleted “and” following “ex officio voting member,” and inserted “and the Director of Regulatory Compliance of the Virginia Building Officials Association, who shall be a member of the Board’s Codes and Standards Committee, but shall not serve as either the chairman of such committee or of the Board” and “except for the Director of Regulatory Compliance of the Virginia Building Officials Association, who shall serve no more than one four-year term.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 747, in subsection A, substituted “Virginia Building and Code Officials Association” for “Virginia Building Officials Association” and deleted “except for the Director of Regulatory Compliance of the Virginia Building Officials Association, who shall serve no more than one four-year term” from the end of the first sentence.

§ 36-136.
Meetings of Board.

The Board shall meet at least once every three months, and on the call of the chairman, when, in his opinion, additional meetings are necessary.

History.

1977, c. 613.

§ 36-137.
Powers and duties of Board; appointment of Building Code Academy Advisory Committee.

The Board shall exercise the following powers and duties, and such others as may be provided by law:

Provide a means of citizen access to the Department.

Provide a means of publicizing the policies and programs of the Department in order to educate the public and elicit public support for Department activities.

Monitor the policies and activities of the Department and have the right of access to departmental information.

Advise the Governor and the Director on matters relating to housing and community development.

Make such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out its responsibilities and repeal or amend such rules when necessary.

Issue a certificate of competence concerning the content, application, and intent of specified subject areas of the building and fire prevention regulations promulgated by the Board to present or prospective personnel of local governments and to any other persons seeking to become qualified to perform inspections pursuant to Chapter 6 (§

36-97

et seq.), Chapter 9 (§

27-94

et seq.) of Title 27, and any regulations adopted thereunder, who have completed training programs or in other ways demonstrated adequate knowledge.

Levy by regulation up to two percent of permit fees authorized pursuant to §§

36-98.3

and

36-105

to support training programs of the Building Code Academy established pursuant to §

36-139

. Local building departments shall collect such levy and transmit it quarterly to the Department of Housing and Community Development. Localities that maintain, individual or regional, training academies accredited by the Department of Housing and Community Development shall retain such levy. However, such localities may send employees to training programs of the Building Code Academy upon payment of a fee calculated to cover the cost of such training. Any unspent balance shall be reappropriated each year for the continued operation of the Building Code Academy.The Board shall appoint a Building Code Academy Advisory Committee (the Committee) comprised of representatives of code enforcement personnel and construction industry professions affected by the provisions of the building and fire prevention regulations promulgated by the Board. Members of the Committee shall receive no compensation but shall be entitled to be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with §

2.2-2813

. The Committee shall advise the Board and the Director on policies, procedures, operations, and other matters pertinent to enhancing the delivery of training services provided by the Building Code Academy.

Establish general policies, procedures, and programs for the Virginia Housing Trust Fund established in Chapter 9 (§

36-141

et seq.).

Determine the categories of housing programs, housing sponsors and persons and families of low and moderate income eligible to participate in grant or loan programs of the Virginia Housing Trust Fund and designate the proportion of such grants or loans to be made available in each category.

Advise the Director of the Department on the program guidelines required to accomplish the policies and procedures of the Virginia Housing Trust Fund.

Advise the Virginia Housing Development Authority and the Director of the Department on matters relating to the administration and management of loans and grants from the Virginia Housing Trust Fund.

Establish the amount of the low-income housing credit, the terms and conditions for qualifying for such credit, and the terms and conditions for computing any credit recapture amount for the Virginia income tax return.

Serve in an advisory capacity to the Center for Housing Research established by §

23.1-2633

.

Advise the Department in the development of the Consolidated Plan Strategy to guide and coordinate the housing programs of the Department, the Virginia Housing Development Authority, and other state agencies and instrumentalities.

Advise the Governor and the Department on the expansion of affordable, accessible housing for older Virginians and Virginians with disabilities, including supportive services.

Establish guidelines for the allocation of private activity bonds to local housing authorities in accordance with the provisions of the Private Activity Bonds program in Chapter 50 (§

15.2-5000

et seq.) of Title 15.2.

History.

1977, c. 613; 1978, c. 751; 1980, c. 107; 1981, c. 309; 1984, c. 720; 1986, c. 427; 1988, c. 687; 1989, c. 279; 1992, c. 754; 1993, c. 814; 2002, cc. 245, 461, 555; 2008, c. 445; 2010, c. 66; 2013, c. 754.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1994, c. 895, cl. 5, provides that the standards for certification of tradesman established by the Board of Housing and Community Development shall remain in effect until such time as the Board for Contractors shall implement standards in accord with Article 3 (§

54.1-1128

et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 54.1.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “23.1-2633” was substituted for “23-135.7:14” in subdivision 13 to conform to the recodification of Title 23 by Acts 2016, c. 588, effective October 1, 2016.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 245 added subdivision 15.

The 2002 amendment by c. 461 substituted “Consolidated Plan” for “Comprehensive Housing Affordability” in subdivision 14.

The 2002 amendment by c. 555, in subdivision 6, inserted “prevention” and inserted “Chapter 9 (§

27-94

et seq.) of Title 27”; and in subdivision 7, substituted “two” for “one” in the first sentence, substituted “that” for “which” in the third sentence, deleted the former last sentence which read: “Annual collections of such levy in excess of $500,000 or any unobligated fund balance greater than one-third of that year’s collections shall be credited against the levy to be collected in the next fiscal year,” and added the second paragraph.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 445 added subdivision 16.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 66 substituted “two percent of permit fees authorized pursuant to §§

36-98.3

and

36-105

” for “two percent of building permit fees authorized pursuant to §

36-105

” in subdivision 7.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 754 substituted “Virginia Housing Trust Fund” for “Virginia Housing Partnership Revolving Fund” throughout the section, inserted “and the Director of the Department” near the middle of subdivision 11, and made minor stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article surveying developments in real estate and land use law in Virginia from June 1, 2001 through June 1, 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 271 (2002).

§ 36-138.
Repealed by Acts 1980, c. 728.

Cross references.

For present provisions as to compensation and expenses of boards, commissions and similar bodies, see §

2.2-2813

.